Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3524
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-3523 to 71-3528:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) High-level radioactive waste means (a) irradiated reactor fuel, (b) liquid wastes resulting from the operation of the first cycle solvent extraction system or equivalent and the concentrated wastes from subsequent extraction cycles or equivalent in a facility for reprocessing irradiated reactor fuel, (c) solids into which such liquid wastes have been converted, and (d) other highly radioactive waste material as defined by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission; and

(3) Transuranic waste means radioactive waste material containing alpha-emitting radioactive elements, with radioactive half-lives greater than five years, having an atomic number greater than 92 in concentrations in excess of one hundred nanocuries per gram.

Laws 2003, LB 165, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 43;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 574;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 378.